Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 8-114, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 8-114. A. Each person elected or appointed for the
first time as an officer of a municipality as defined by paragraph 6
of Section 1-102 of this title, shall be required within one (1)
year after taking the oath of office to attend an institute
cumulative training totaling eight (8) hours for municipal
officials. The Institute training shall be conducted at all times
in-person or virtually, in cooperation with the Oklahoma Department
Req. No. 11814 Page 1

of C areer and Technology Education, by or under the supervision of a
statewide organization that is exempt from taxation under federal
law and designated pursuant to the provisions of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 170(a). The statewide organization
shall demonstrate to the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education that it has represented municipalities, had
statutory functions and conducted training programs for
municipalities for at least fifteen (15) years prior to November 1,
2005. It shall further demonstrate that its continuous official
purpose is to promote the general welfare of cities and towns, to
foster or conduct schools, short courses and other training
sessions, to provide technical assistance and consultive services
and other aids for the improvement and increased efficiency of city
and town government, and to serve as the representative of cities
and towns in carrying out the duties and prerogatives conferred on
it by state law an instructor or organization who has been certified
by the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education.
B. The Institute training shall consist of eight (8) cumulative
hours of instruction. A certificate Certificates of completion
shall be awarded to those persons who attend and successfully
complete the Institute training and a list of those persons shall be
filed with the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education.

Req. No. 11814 Page 2

C. The curriculum for the Institute training shall include, but
not be limited to: municipal budget requirements, the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act, the Oklahoma Open Records Act, ethics, procedures for
conducting meetings, conflict of interest, and purchasing
procedures, municipal election procedure, and forms of municipal
government.
D. The Institute shall be held at a minimum of six regional
locations in the state. Every effort shall be made by the Institute
to accommodate training through long-distance learning.
E. A person elected or appointed to a municipal office who
fails to satisfy the education requirements of this section shall
cease to hold the office commencing at the next scheduled meeting of
the governing body following the first-year anniversary of the
person's taking the oath of office. If the official fails to
complete the training outline in this act, they may not be
reappointed to the position or other position(s) within the local
government until they have completed the required training.
F E. At the time of filing, the designated statewide
organization shall provide the necessary information to the
candidate of the option for attendance at the Institute training as
provided for in this section. In the case of officials nominated
and elected for municipal offices at town meetings, the presiding
officer of the town meeting shall notify the candidate of the

Req. No. 11814 Page 3

opti on. By definition, the presiding officer is the senior most
member of the council or board of trustees.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11814 MJ 12/09/24



















Req. No. 11814 Page 4